test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+2Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonyiwaag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+21+Loc: gigookookohoonsinaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+21+Obv: gigookookohoonsinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+21+Pl: gigookookohoonsinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+2Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonsiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+2Pl+Obv: gigookookohoonsiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+2Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonsiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Obv+Loc: ogookookohoonyiniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Obv+Obv: ogookookohoonyiniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Obv+Pl: ogookookohoonyiniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonyiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Pl+Obv: ogookookohoonyiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+3Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonyiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Obv+Loc: ogookookohoonsiniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Obv+Obv: ogookookohoonsiniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Obv+Pl: ogookookohoonsiniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonsiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Pl+Obv: ogookookohoonsiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+3Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonsiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoonyibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoonyibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoonyibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoonsibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoonsibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoonsibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonyibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonyibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonyibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonsibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonsibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonsibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonyibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonyibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonyibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonsibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonsibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonsibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Loc: igookookohoonyibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Obv: igookookohoonyibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pret+Pl: igookookohoonyibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Loc: igookookohoonsibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Obv: igookookohoonsibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pret+Pl: igookookohoonsibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nigookookohoomishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+21: gigookookohoomishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gigookookohoomishiwaa
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3Obv: ogookookohoomishini
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3Pl: ogookookohoomishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: nigookookohoomishiban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [nigookookohoomishidig, nigookookohoomishidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: gigookookohoomishiban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [gigookookohoomishidig, gigookookohoomishidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: ogookookohoomishiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [ogookookohoomishidig, ogookookohoomishidog]
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pret: igookookohoomishiban
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+VocPl: [igookookohoomishidig, igookookohoomishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: nigookookohoomishing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: nigookookohoomishan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: nigookookohoomishag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: gigookookohoomishing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: gigookookohoomishan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: gigookookohoomishag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: ogookookohoomishing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: ogookookohoomishan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: ogookookohoomishag
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Loc: igookookohoomishing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Obv: igookookohoomishan
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+Pl: igookookohoomishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pret: nigookookohoominaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1Pl+VocPl: [nigookookohoominaanidig, nigookookohoominaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+21+Pret: gigookookohoominaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+21+VocPl: [gigookookohoominaanidig, gigookookohoominaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pret: gigookookohoomiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+2Pl+VocPl: [gigookookohoomiwaadig, gigookookohoomiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pret: ogookookohoominiiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Obv+VocPl: [ogookookohoominiidig, ogookookohoominiidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pret: ogookookohoomiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Pl+VocPl: [ogookookohoomiwaadig, ogookookohoomiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1Pl+Loc: nigookookohoominaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1Pl+Obv: nigookookohoominaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+1Pl+Pl: nigookookohoominaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+21+Loc: gigookookohoominaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+21+Obv: gigookookohoominaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+21+Pl: gigookookohoominaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+2Pl+Loc: gigookookohoomiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+2Pl+Obv: gigookookohoomiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+2Pl+Pl: gigookookohoomiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Obv+Loc: ogookookohoominiing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Obv+Obv: ogookookohoominiin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Obv+Pl: ogookookohoominiig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Pl+Loc: ogookookohoomiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Pl+Obv: ogookookohoomiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+3Pl+Pl: ogookookohoomiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoomibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoomibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoomibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoomibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoomibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoomibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoomibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoomibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoomibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Loc: igookookohoomibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Obv: igookookohoomibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pret+Pl: igookookohoomibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nigookookohooshinaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nigookookohooshinaanidig, nigookookohooshinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+Pret: gigookookohooshinaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+VocPl: [gigookookohooshinaanidig, gigookookohooshinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gigookookohooshiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gigookookohooshiwaadig, gigookookohooshiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret: ogookookohooshiniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [ogookookohooshiniidig, ogookookohooshiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret: ogookookohooshiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [ogookookohooshiwaadig, ogookookohooshiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nigookookohooshinaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nigookookohooshinaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nigookookohooshinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+Loc: gigookookohooshinaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+Obv: gigookookohooshinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+Pl: gigookookohooshinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gigookookohooshiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gigookookohooshiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gigookookohooshiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+Loc: ogookookohooshiniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+Obv: ogookookohooshiniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pl: ogookookohooshiniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+Loc: ogookookohooshiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+Obv: ogookookohooshiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pl: ogookookohooshiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: nigookookohooshibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: nigookookohooshibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: nigookookohooshibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: gigookookohooshibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: gigookookohooshibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: gigookookohooshibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: ogookookohooshibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: ogookookohooshibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: ogookookohooshibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Loc: igookookohooshibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Obv: igookookohooshibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+Pret+Pl: igookookohooshibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoonaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoonaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoonaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nigookookohoonaanidig, nigookookohoonaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nigookookohoonaanidig, nigookookohoonaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nigookookohoonaanidig, nigookookohoonaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohoonaanidig, gigookookohoonaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohoonaanidig, gigookookohoonaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+21+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohoonaanidig, gigookookohoonaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoowaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoowaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoowaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohoowaadig, gigookookohoowaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohoowaadig, gigookookohoowaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohoowaadig, gigookookohoowaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ogookookohooniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ogookookohooniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ogookookohooniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohooniidig, ogookookohooniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohooniidig, ogookookohooniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohooniidig, ogookookohooniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoowaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoowaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoowaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohoowaadig, ogookookohoowaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohoowaadig, ogookookohoowaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohoowaadig, ogookookohoowaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: gookookohoonyishibaniing
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: gookookohoonyishibaniin
     gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: gookookohoonyishibaniig
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: gookookohoonsishibaniing
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: gookookohoonsishibaniin
     gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: gookookohoonsishibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nigookookohoonyimishinaan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl: nigookookohoonsimishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21: gigookookohoonyimishinaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl: gigookookohoonyimishiwaa
